Utah statutes.
48-1d-605.   Power of legal representative of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner's legal representative may exercise:

(1)  the rights of a transferee provided in Subsection 48-1d-603(3); and

(2)  for purposes of settling the estate, the rights the deceased partner had under Section 48-1d-403.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

